Idaho, session 2026, H0776.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
protect infants and children from abuse, neglect, and sexual exploitation
by requiring an expedited child protection safety review of children less
than one year of age when parents, guardians, or legal custodians have a
history of child abuse, sexual offenses, or prior termination of parental
rights due to abuse or neglect. Infants are uniquely vulnerable and may suf-
fer irreparable harm when safety concerns are not identified and addressed
immediately. It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure timely safety
verification and appropriate planning for children born into high-risk cir-
cumstances.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 16, Title 16, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 16-1650, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
16-1650. NEWBORN SAFETY REVIEW. (1) Any report made to the department
by a mandatory reporter pursuant to section 16-1605, Idaho Code, alleging a
parent, guardian, or legal custodian is a caregiver to a child that is less
than one (1) year of age and has a risk factor described in subsection (2)
of this section, the department shall verify the reported risk factor within
twelve (12) hours of receiving the report. If the reported risk factor is
verified, the department shall initiate a priority I response, as defined by
the department, and shall complete a full written safety assessment.
(2) Risk factors that require action by the department pursuant to sub-
section (1) of this section are as follows:
(a) A parent, guardian, or legal custodian's identifying information
appears in the department's child protection central registry going
back no more than ten (10) years;
(b) A parent, guardian, or legal custodian has been convicted of injury
to a child pursuant to section 18-1501, Idaho Code;
(c) A parent, guardian, or legal custodian's parental rights were ter-
minated in a proceeding pursuant to this chapter; or
(d) A parent, guardian, or legal custodian's child was born with neona-
tal abstinence syndrome.
(3) For the purposes of this section, "verify" means use of the depart-
ment's internal records to substantiate termination of parental rights and,
when possible, the use of official, public-facing repositories of Idaho


criminal or medical records in order to confirm the existence of a reported
risk factor.
(4) The department's safety assessment shall include:
(a) The current compliance of each parent, guardian, or legal custodian
with court-ordered conditions, treatment, or supervision related to a
prior offense, insofar as can be determined;
(b) The child's living environment with the parent, guardian, legal
custodian, or caregiver and other household members; and
(c) A summary of the department's prior investigation of allegations
of child abuse, abandonment, or neglect pertaining to members of the
household and any services provided to members of the household by the
division for youth safety and permanency at the department.
(5) When a law enforcement agency makes a report to the department pur-
suant to section 16-1605, Idaho Code, such report shall include any known or
reported risk factors described in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a presumption
of abuse or neglect based solely on a medical condition, diagnosis, or indi-
cator.
(7) If the department concludes that verification of a risk factor
described in subsection (2) of this section cannot be accomplished within
twelve (12) hours or if the department concludes that public safety would
be better served by immediately escalating the response, the department may
initiate a priority I response instead of making continued efforts to ver-
ify the risk factors and shall prepare a safety assessment as set forth in
subsection (4) of this section, notwithstanding the lack of a verified risk
factor.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.